Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1114
Officers; alternate; acting officer; title.

The specific title of an alternate or acting officer shall correspond to that of the officer to the powers and duties of whom he is designated to succeed or has succeeded; for example, Alternate, or Acting, Secretary of State; Alternate, or Acting, District Judge, .......... District; Alternate, or Acting, Commissioner, .......... County; Alternate, or Acting, Clerk, City of ............... .

Laws 1959, c. 457, § 14, p. 1521.